Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Community Volunteerism and Service

194A.570.
Serve Kentucky.

Serve Kentucky is created and shall be attached to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for oversight, technical, and administrative support purposes. A director and other appropriate staff shall be hired by Serve Kentucky when federal funds become available.

HISTORY:
Repealed, reenact, and amend, Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 37, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 114, § 4, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.572.
Serve Kentucky membership — Term limits.

Serve Kentucky shall initially consist of twenty-five (25) voting members who shall be appointed by the Governor. Membership on Serve Kentucky shall be for a three (3) year term, with the exception that initially one third (1/3) of the members shall serve for a term of one (1) year, one-third (1/3) of the members shall serve for a term of two (2) years, and one-third (1/3) of the members shall serve for a term of three (3) years. After the first six (6) months of operations, the Governor reserves the option to request Serve Kentucky to submit recommendations for any additional members deemed necessary to balance Serve Kentucky’s perspective, provided that Serve Kentucky’s membership does not exceed twenty-five (25). Serve Kentucky shall annually select from its membership a chair to serve for a term of one (1) year.

HISTORY:
Enact Acts 1996, ch. 310, § 2, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenacted Acts 2000, ch. 203, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 38, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 114, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.575.
Purpose of Serve Kentucky.

The purpose of Serve Kentucky is to engage in statewide strategic planning, establish relevant policies, provide administrative oversight, and promote programs and strengthen the service ethic among the Commonwealth’s citizens by facilitating the development of strategic programs that enable citizens to address serious societal problems including, but not limited to, education reform through service to local communities.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 310, §
3, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 203, §
3, effective July 14, 2000; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 39, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 114, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

194A.578.
Duties of Serve Kentucky — Authority for administrative regulations.

Serve Kentucky shall:

Develop a strategic plan for service in Kentucky which covers a three (3) year period, and supporting efforts to achieve the goals of this plan. The plan shall be updated annually;

Oversee and submit Kentucky’s annual applications to the Corporation for National Service, the federal funding authority, and other funding sources for the continuation and any expansion of the current Kentucky Serve initiative;

Conduct a competitive application process to determine the organizations that will be awarded subgrants to operate national service programs;

Fulfill any other responsibilities required by the Corporation for National Service and other funding sources; and

Promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to establish operational guidelines for Serve Kentucky.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 310, §
4, effective July 15, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2000, ch. 203, §
4, effective July 14, 2000; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2005, ch. 99, § 40, effective June 20, 2005; 2018 ch. 114, § 7, effective July 14, 2018.